Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1710
Parking authority; purchases, construction, maintenance, improvement or extension; contract; bids.

All purchases and all contracts relating to the construction, maintenance, improvement, or extension of the facilities, other than contracts relating to the acquiring of real property or some interest therein or contracts of employment or some specialized service, involving the expenditure of two thousand dollars or more, shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder after not less than twenty days' public notice of request for bids.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 10, p. 107.